Wisconsin, session 2025, SB802.
do enact as follows:SB802,11Section 1. 20.165 (1) (hr) of the statutes is created to read:SB802,2,4220.165 (1) (hr) Health professional assistance programs. All moneys received 3from fees under s. 440.10 (2) (d) for costs associated with the health professional 4assistance program under s. 440.10.SB802,25Section 2. 440.03 (9) (a) (intro.) of the statutes, as affected by 2025 6Wisconsin Act 20, is amended to read:SB802,2,127440.03 (9) (a) (intro.) Subject to pars. (b) and (c) and s. ss. 440.10 (2) (d) and 8458.33 (2) (b) and (5), the department shall, biennially, determine each fee for an 9initial credential for which no examination is required, for a reciprocal credential, 10and for a credential renewal and any fees imposed under ss. 447.51 (2), 448.986 (2), 11448.9875 (2), 448.9885 (2), 448.9888 (2), 457.51 (2), and 459.71 (2) by doing all of the 12following:SB802,313Section 3. 440.10 of the statutes is created to read:SB802,2,1514440.10 Health professional assistance program. (1) Definitions. In 15this section:SB802,2,1716(a) “Impairment” means an inability of a health care provider to practice with 17reasonable skill or safety due to a health condition.SB802,2,1918(b) “Participant” means a holder of a participating credential who participates 19in the program, as described in sub. (3) (b).SB802,3,21(c) “Participating credential” means a credential with respect to which a 2credentialing board is participating in the program, as provided in sub. (2) (b).SB802,3,53(d) “Participating credentialing board” means a credentialing board that is 4participating in the program with respect to one or more credentials, as provided in 5sub. (2) (b).SB802,3,76(e) “Program” means the health professional assistance program operated by 7an entity with which the department enters into a contract under sub. (2) (a).SB802,3,148(2) Contract; participation and fees. (a) The department shall contract 9with an entity to establish and operate a health professional assistance program to 10coordinate detection, evaluation, treatment, and continuing care monitoring for 11health care providers described in sub. (3) (b) who are suffering from a condition 12that could lead to impairment. A contract under this paragraph shall establish the 13specific services that the program may provide. The entity described under this 14paragraph must meet all of the following requirements:SB802,3,16151. The entity is sponsored by one or more professional associations or societies 16of health care providers.SB802,3,19172. The entity is an entity organized under the law of this state that is 18described in section 501 (c) (3) of the Internal Revenue Code and that is exempt 19from federal income tax under section 501 (a) of the Internal Revenue Code.SB802,3,22203. The entity contracts with or employs a medical director who holds a license 21to practice medicine and surgery under subch. II ch. 448 and specializes or has 22training and expertise in addiction medicine.SB802,3,24234. The entity contracts with or employs health care providers necessary for 24the entity’s operations.SB802,4,51(b) A credentialing board that regulates health care providers may participate 2in the program with respect to one or more credentials issued by that board. If a 3credentialing board participates in the program, the credentialing board is not 4required to participate in the program with respect to each credential issued by the 5board, but may limit its participation to one or more specified credentials.SB802,4,66(c) The program shall adopt procedures for all of the following:SB802,4,771. Determining eligibility for the services of program.SB802,4,982. Contracting or coordinating with a network of health care providers to 9provide care for participants.SB802,4,10103. Receiving and assessing reports under sub. (5).SB802,4,11114. Safeguarding confidentiality as required under sub. (6).SB802,4,12125. Monitoring the continuing care and support of participants.SB802,4,14136. Intervening when participants violate any terms of program participation 14or when participants may require additional evaluation or treatment.SB802,4,17157. Reporting to the participating credentialing board on the progress and 16program compliance of participants who have consented to the disclosure of such 17information under sub. (6) (a) 3.SB802,4,18188. Performing any other agreed upon activities.SB802,4,2219(d) The department shall, in addition to the applicable fee determined under 20s. 440.03 (9), charge a fee of $70 to the holder of each participating credential, to be 21paid at the time the health care provider is issued an initial credential and at the 22time the health care provider renews their credential.SB802,4,2423(e) The department shall ensure that the program is coordinated with the 24procedure under s. 440.03 (1c).SB802,5,21(f) The department shall pay the costs associated with the contract under this 2subsection from the appropriation under s. 20.165 (1) (hr).SB802,5,43(3) Health professional assistance program. All of the following apply to 4the program:SB802,5,55(a) The program shall provide all services established under sub. (2) (a).SB802,5,86(b) The program shall allow holders of participating credentials who are 7suffering from a condition that could lead to impairment to participate in the 8program on a voluntary and confidential basis.SB802,5,119(c) The program and its employees, officers, and agents shall be immune from 10civil liability for any damages that result from the provision of services described, or 11the taking of any action authorized, under this section.SB802,5,1412(d) The program shall base the scope of services provided to participants on 13information that is science-based and published in peer-reviewed journals and 14textbooks and accords with national standards.SB802,5,1815(4) Voluntary assistance. (a) A health care provider who holds a 16participating credential may voluntarily request participation in the program for a 17condition that could lead to impairment if the health care provider believes that 18their participation is necessary to prevent or reverse impairment.SB802,5,2319(b) A participant’s voluntary participation in the program or any treatment 20received through the program shall not limit a credentialing board’s authority to 21investigate, discipline, or take action to suspend, limit, or revoke the credential of 22the health care provider on the basis of violations based on conduct unrelated to the 23health care provider’s participation in the program.SB802,6,224(5) Reports to program. (a) 1. A health care provider who reasonably 1believes that a colleague health care provider has a condition that could lead to 2impairment may report the colleague health care provider to the program. Down Down /2025/related/proposals/sb802 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/sb802 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB802 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB802 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»SB802: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting